Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB655.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Student Data Security.--(a) The department shall develop, in consultation with the Office of Information Technology, and update regularly, but no less than annually, a model data security plan for the protection of student data held by a school entity.(b) The model student data security plan shall include:(1) Guidelines for access to student data and student data systems, including guidelines for authentication of authorized access.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) Privacy compliance standards.(3) Privacy and security audits.(4) Procedures to follow in the event of a breach of student data.(5) Data retention and disposition policies.(c) The model plan and any updates shall be made available to all school entities.(d) The department shall designate a chief data security officer, with any State money as made available, to assist a school entity, upon request, with the development and implementation of a student data security plan and to develop best practice recommendations regarding the use, retention and protection of student data.(e) The department shall convene a working group to assist with the development of initial instructions, procedures, services, security assessments, best practices and security measures required by this section for the development of a model student data security plan. The working group shall include the Secretary of Education, the chief information officer, representatives from school entities across this Commonwealth and other parties deemed necessary by the department.(f) The working group shall compile a report on or before December 1, 2026, on the cost of developing and implementing a model student data security plan. The working group shall submit the report to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.20250HB0655PN0664 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Personally identifiable information." The term includes, but is not limited to:(1) The student's name.(2) The name of the student's parent or other family members.(3) The address of the student or student's family.(4) A personal identifier, such as the student's Social Security number, student number or biometric record.(5) Other indirect identifiers, such as the student's date of birth, place of birth and mother's maiden name.(6) Other information that, alone or in combination, is linked or linkable to a specific student that would allow a reasonable person in the school community, who does not have personal knowledge of the relevant circumstances, to identify the student with reasonable certainty.(7) Information requested by a person who the educational agency or institution reasonably believes knows the identity of the student to whom the education record relates."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Student data." Personally identifiable information from student records of a school entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0655PN0664 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829